Massachusetts, session 194th, H1399.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 25 of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
“(a) For the purposes of this chapter, health reimbursement arrangements shall satisfy the
group insurance requirements to eligible retired employees as defined in section 1 and their
Medicare eligible dependents and permit said employees and their Medicare eligible dependents
to enter into a health insurance plan purchased on the individual Medicare marketplace. In lieu of
the premium cost sharing arrangement outlined in Section 2, minimum annual funding for such
health reimbursement arrangements of this chapter for each eligible retired employee and/or
dependent shall be established by adding 50% of the sum of the lowest cost Medicare
of 2

Supplement 1 plan filed in the Commonwealth by January 1 of the current calendar year plus the
weighted average Part D premium in Region 2 for the prior calendar year.”
SECTION 2. Section 4 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
“(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, Medicare
eligible retired employees and their Medicare eligible dependents subject to the provisions of this
chapter shall be permitted to enter into a health insurance plan purchased on the individual
Medicare marketplace. In lieu of the premium cost sharing arrangement outlined in this chapter,
minimum annual funding for such health reimbursement arrangements defined by section 25 of
chapter 32B shall be established by adding “X%” of the sum of the lowest cost Medicare
Supplement 1 plan filed in the Commonwealth by January 1 of the current calendar year plus the
weighted average Part D premium in Region 2 for the prior calendar year, where “X%” equals
the current premium cost sharing between the Commonwealth and eligible retirees.”
of 2